Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Farm Labor Contractors Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Certified exempt contractor means a farm labor contractor that holds a valid certificate of exemption described in subdivision (7) of section 48-1703;

(2) Department means the Department of Labor;

(3) Detasseling means the act of removing a tassel, which bears the staminate flower of corn, by hand labor to prevent the self-pollination of such corn;

(4) Farm labor contractor means any individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or cooperative association, other than an agricultural employer, an agricultural association, or an employee of an agricultural employer or agricultural association, who for any money or other valuable consideration paid or promised to be paid performs any farm labor contracting activity;

(5) Farm labor contracting activity means recruiting, soliciting, hiring, employing, furnishing, or transporting any migrant or seasonal agricultural worker;

(6) Non-English-speaking worker has the same meaning as non-English-speaking employee in section 48-2208;

(7) Nonexempt contractor means a farm labor contractor that does not hold a valid certificate of exemption described in subdivision (7) of section 48-1703;

(8) Roguing means the act of removing unwanted, off-type, inferior, or defective plants from an agricultural field by hand labor; and

(9) Worker means a person who is employed or recruited by or who subcontracts with a farm labor contractor.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 301;

Laws 2002, LB 931, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 418, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB844, § 2.